Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2707.01
Grant; engineering and technical studies; evaluation criteria.

The department shall evaluate all applications for grants of assistance under section 13-2704.02 based on the following criteria:

(1) Financial Support. Assistance from the fund shall be matched at least equally from local sources. At least fifty percent of the local match must be in cash. Projects with a higher level of local matching funds shall be preferred as compared to those with a lower level of matching funds; and

(2) Project Location. Assistance from the fund shall be for engineering and technical studies related to projects that will be located in the municipality that applies for the grant or, for any city of the first class, city of the second class, or village, in the municipality's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction. This subdivision shall not apply to any application submitted by a tribal government.

Laws 2013, LB153, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB564, § 7;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 5.
July 21, 2022